Connecticut, session 2026, SB00076.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
That chapter 229 of the general statutes be amended to (1) establish a
child and dependent tax credit against the personal income tax of five
hundred dollars per child or dependent, for (A) children under
seventeen years of age, (B) a disabled dependent or disabled spouse,
who resides with the taxpayer for more than half the taxable year, or (C)
a dependent sixty-five years of age or older who is not the spouse of the
taxpayer, and (2) provide for income threshold phase-outs of the credit
of ten per cent for each one thousand dollars or fraction thereof of
adjusted gross income over (A) two hundred thousand dollars for
unmarried individuals, married individuals filing separately and heads
of households, and (B) four hundred thousand dollars for married
individuals filing jointly.
LCO No. 124 1 of 2

Proposed Bill No. 76